Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1603
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Propane Education and Research Act, the definitions found in sections 66-1604 to 66-1616 shall be used.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 3.